Utah statutes.
41-3-405.   Sale of third party warranty or service contract -- Remission of fee.

(1)  If a dealer licensed under this chapter sells a third party warranty or service contract to a customer, the dealer shall within 15 days remit the fee paid by the customer to the warranty or service contract company.

(2)  Failure of a dealer to remit the fee within 15 days is a ground for dealer license suspension and allows the customer a cause of action against the dealer for damages that otherwise would have been covered by the warranty or service contract.

